Hawaii statutes.
§663J-5 Damages. An individual
entitled to bring an action under section 663J-3 may recover all of the
following damages:

(1) Economic damages proximately caused by coercion
into prostitution or being the subject of sex trafficking;

(2) Noneconomic damages proximately caused by
coercion into prostitution or being the subject of sex trafficking;

(3) Exemplary damages;

(4) Reasonable attorney's fees; and

(5) Costs of suit, including reasonable expenses for
expert testimony. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 206, §6]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next